District of Columbia statutes.
38-2021.15

[Omitted].

For temporary addition of the Act of Aug. 7, 1946, ch. 779, § 15a, concerning disposition of forfeitures, see § 2(i) of the Retirement of Public-School Teachers Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-584, January 1, 2013, 60 DCR 134).